test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-subst-2tav-reduced-e_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Noun - runne: # ok HADDE
    runne+N+Sg+Nom:  runne
    runne+N+Sg+Gen:  ruˊṇe
    runne+N+Sg+Acc:  ruˊṇe
    runne+N+Sg+Ill:  ruuṇán
    runne+N+Sg+Loc:  runneest
    runne+N+Sg+Com:  runnijn
    runne+N+Sg+Abe:  ruˊṇettáá
    runne+N+Ess:  runnen
    runne+N+Par:  runned
    runne+N+Pl+Nom:  ruˊṇeh
    runne+N+Pl+Gen:  [ruuṇij, ruˊṇij]
    runne+N+Pl+Acc:  ruuṇijd
    runne+N+Pl+Ill:  runnijd
    runne+N+Pl+Loc:  ruuṇijn
    runne+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊṇijguin
    runne+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊṇijttáá

  Noun - cumme: # ok HADDE
    cumme+N+Sg+Nom:  cumme
    cumme+N+Sg+Gen:  cuˊṃe
    cumme+N+Sg+Acc:  cuˊṃe
    cumme+N+Sg+Ill:  cuuṃán
    cumme+N+Sg+Loc:  cummeest
    cumme+N+Sg+Com:  cummijn
    cumme+N+Sg+Abe:  cuˊṃettáá
    cumme+N+Ess:  cummen
    cumme+N+Par:  cummed
    cumme+N+Pl+Nom:  cuˊṃeh
    cumme+N+Pl+Gen:  [cuuṃij, cuˊṃij]
    cumme+N+Pl+Acc:  cuuṃijd
    cumme+N+Pl+Ill:  [cuuṃijd, cummijd]
    cumme+N+Pl+Loc:  cuuṃijn
    cumme+N+Pl+Com:  cuˊṃijguin
    cumme+N+Pl+Abe:  cuˊṃijttáá

  Noun - pille: # ok HADDE
    pille+N+Sg+Nom:  pille
    pille+N+Sg+Gen:  piˊḷe
    pille+N+Sg+Acc:  piˊḷe
    pille+N+Sg+Ill:  piiḷán
    pille+N+Sg+Loc:  pilleest
    pille+N+Sg+Com:  pillijn
    pille+N+Sg+Abe:  piˊḷettáá
    pille+N+Ess:  pillen
    pille+N+Par: pilled
    pille+N+Pl+Nom:  piˊḷeh
    pille+N+Pl+Gen:  [piiḷij, piˊḷij]
    pille+N+Pl+Acc:  piiḷijd
    pille+N+Pl+Ill:  [piiḷijd, pillijd]
    pille+N+Pl+Loc:  piiḷijn
    pille+N+Pl+Com:  piˊḷijguin
    pille+N+Pl+Abe:  piˊḷijttáá

  Noun - nartte: # ok HADDE
    nartte+N+Sg+Nom:  nartte
    nartte+N+Sg+Gen:  naˊrte
    nartte+N+Sg+Acc:  naˊrte
    nartte+N+Sg+Ill:  naartan
    nartte+N+Sg+Loc:  nartteest
    nartte+N+Sg+Com:  norttijn
    nartte+N+Sg+Abe:  naˊrtettáá
    nartte+N+Ess:  nartten
    nartte+N+Par:  nartted
    nartte+N+Pl+Nom:  naˊrteh
    nartte+N+Pl+Gen:  [noortij, noˊrtij]
    nartte+N+Pl+Acc:  noortijd
    nartte+N+Pl+Ill:  norttijd
    nartte+N+Pl+Loc:  noortijn
    nartte+N+Pl+Com:  nortijguin
    nartte+N+Pl+Abe:  noˊrtijttáá

  Noun - luŋkke: # ok HADDE
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Nom:  luŋkke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Gen:  luˊŋke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Acc:  luˊŋke
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Ill:  luuŋkán
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Loc:  luŋkkeest
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Com:  luŋkkijn
    luŋkke+N+Sg+Abe:  luˊŋkettáá
    luŋkke+N+Ess:  luŋkken
    luŋkke+N+Par:  luŋkked
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Nom:  luˊŋkeh
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Gen:  [luuŋkij, luˊŋkij]
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Acc:  luuŋkijd
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Ill:  luŋkkijd
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Loc:  luuŋkijn
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Com:  luˊŋkijguin
    luŋkke+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊŋkijttáá

  Noun - puicce: # ok HADDE
    puicce+N+Sg+Nom:  puicce
    puicce+N+Sg+Gen:  puˊice
    puicce+N+Sg+Acc:  puˊice
    puicce+N+Sg+Ill:  puuicán
    puicce+N+Sg+Loc:  puicceest
    puicce+N+Sg+Com:  puiccijn
    puicce+N+Sg+Abe:  puˊicettáá
    puicce+N+Ess:  puiccen
    puicce+N+Par:  puiccen
    puicce+N+Pl+Nom:  puˊiceh
    puicce+N+Pl+Gen:  [puuicij, puˊicij]
    puicce+N+Pl+Acc:  puuicijd
    puicce+N+Pl+Ill:  puiccijd
    puicce+N+Pl+Loc:  puuicijn
    puicce+N+Pl+Com:  puˊicijguin
    puicce+N+Pl+Abe:  puˊicijttáá

  Noun - lakke: # ok HADDE
    lakke+N+Sg+Nom:  lakke
    lakke+N+Sg+Gen:  laˊhe
    lakke+N+Sg+Acc:  laˊhe
    lakke+N+Sg+Ill:  laakan
    lakke+N+Sg+Loc:  lahheest
    lakke+N+Sg+Com:  lohhijn
    lakke+N+Sg+Abe:  laˊhettáá
    lakke+N+Ess:  lakken
    lakke+N+Par:  lakked
    lakke+N+Pl+Nom:  laˊheh
    lakke+N+Pl+Gen:  [loohij, loˊhij]
    lakke+N+Pl+Acc:  loohijd
    lakke+N+Pl+Ill:  lohhijd
    lakke+N+Pl+Loc:  loohijn
    lakke+N+Pl+Com:  loˊhijguin
    lakke+N+Pl+Abe:  loˊhijttáá

  Noun - lokke: # ok HADDE
    lokke+N+Sg+Nom:  lokke
    lokke+N+Sg+Gen:  loˊhe
    lokke+N+Sg+Acc:  loˊhe
    lokke+N+Sg+Ill:  lookán
    lokke+N+Sg+Loc:  lohheest
    lokke+N+Sg+Com:  luhhijn
    lokke+N+Sg+Abe:  loˊhettáá
    lokke+N+Ess:  lokken
    lokke+N+Par:  lokked
    lokke+N+Pl+Nom:  loˊheh
    lokke+N+Pl+Gen: [luuhij, luˊhij]
    lokke+N+Pl+Acc:  luuhijd
    lokke+N+Pl+Ill:  luhhijd
    lokke+N+Pl+Loc:  luuhijn
    lokke+N+Pl+Com:  luˊhijguin
    lokke+N+Pl+Abe:  luˊhijttáá

  Noun - rokke: # ok HADDE
    rokke+N+Sg+Nom:  rokke
    rokke+N+Sg+Gen:  roˊhe
    rokke+N+Sg+Acc:  roˊhe
    rokke+N+Sg+Ill:  rookán
    rokke+N+Sg+Loc:  rohheest
    rokke+N+Sg+Com:  ruhhijn
    rokke+N+Sg+Abe:  roˊhettáá
    rokke+N+Ess:  rokken
    rokke+N+Par:  rokked
    rokke+N+Pl+Nom:  roˊheh
    rokke+N+Pl+Gen: [ruuhij, ruˊhij]
    rokke+N+Pl+Acc:  ruuhijd
    rokke+N+Pl+Ill:  ruhhijd
    rokke+N+Pl+Loc:  ruuhijn
    rokke+N+Pl+Com:  ruˊhijguin
    rokke+N+Pl+Abe:  ruˊhijttáá

  Noun - čukke: # ok HADDE
    čukke+N+Sg+Nom:  čukke
    čukke+N+Sg+Gen:  čuˊhe
    čukke+N+Sg+Acc:  čuˊhe
    čukke+N+Sg+Ill:  čuukán
    čukke+N+Sg+Loc:  čuhheest
    čukke+N+Sg+Com:  čuhhijn
    čukke+N+Sg+Abe:  čuˊhettáá
    čukke+N+Ess:  čukken
    čukke+N+Par:  čukked
    čukke+N+Pl+Nom:  čuˊheh
    čukke+N+Pl+Gen: [čuuhij, čuˊhij]
    čukke+N+Pl+Acc:  čuuhijd
    čukke+N+Pl+Ill:  čuhhijd
    čukke+N+Pl+Loc:  čuuhijn
    čukke+N+Pl+Com:  čuˊhijguin
    čukke+N+Pl+Abe:  čuˊhijttáá

  Noun - mokke: # ok HADDE
    mokke+N+Sg+Nom:  mokke
    mokke+N+Sg+Gen:  moˊhe
    mokke+N+Sg+Acc:  moˊhe
    mokke+N+Sg+Ill:  mookán
    mokke+N+Sg+Loc:  mohheest
    mokke+N+Sg+Com:  muhhijn
    mokke+N+Sg+Abe:  moˊhettáá
    mokke+N+Ess:  mokken
    mokke+N+Par:  mokked
    mokke+N+Pl+Nom:  moˊheh
    mokke+N+Pl+Gen: [muuhij, muˊhij]
    mokke+N+Pl+Acc:  muuhijd
    mokke+N+Pl+Ill:  muhhijd
    mokke+N+Pl+Loc:  muuhijn
    mokke+N+Pl+Com:  muˊhijguin
    mokke+N+Pl+Abe:  muˊhijttáá

  Noun - tikke: # ok HADDE
    tikke+N+Sg+Nom:  tikke
    tikke+N+Sg+Gen:  tiˊhe
    tikke+N+Sg+Acc:  tiˊhe
    tikke+N+Sg+Ill:  tiikán
    tikke+N+Sg+Loc:  tihheest
    tikke+N+Sg+Com:  tihhijn
    tikke+N+Sg+Abe:  tiˊhettáá
    tikke+N+Ess:  tikken
    tikke+N+Par:  tikked
    tikke+N+Pl+Nom:  tiˊheh
    tikke+N+Pl+Gen: [tiihij, tiˊhij]
    tikke+N+Pl+Acc:  tiihijd
    tikke+N+Pl+Ill:  tihhijd
    tikke+N+Pl+Loc:  tiihijn
    tikke+N+Pl+Com:  tiˊhijguin
    tikke+N+Pl+Abe:  tiˊhijttáá

  Noun - tigge: # ok HADDE
    tigge+N+Sg+Nom: tigge
    tigge+N+Sg+Gen: tiˊge
    tigge+N+Sg+Acc: tiˊge
    tigge+N+Sg+Ill: tiigán
    tigge+N+Sg+Loc: tiggeest
    tigge+N+Sg+Com: tiggijn
    tigge+N+Sg+Abe: tiˊgettáá
    tigge+N+Ess: tiggen
    tigge+N+Par: tigged
    tigge+N+Pl+Nom: tiˊgeh
    tigge+N+Pl+Gen: [tiigij, tiˊgij]
    tigge+N+Pl+Acc: tiigijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Ill: tiggijd
    tigge+N+Pl+Loc: tiigijn
    tigge+N+Pl+Com: tiˊgijguin
    tigge+N+Pl+Abe: tiˊgijttáá

  Noun - kukse: # ok HADDE
    kukse+N+Sg+Nom:  kukse
    kukse+N+Sg+Gen:  kuˊvse
    kukse+N+Sg+Acc:  kuˊvse
    kukse+N+Sg+Ill:  kuuksán
    kukse+N+Sg+Loc:  kuvseest
    kukse+N+Sg+Com:  kuvssijn
    kukse+N+Sg+Abe:  kuˊvsettáá
    kukse+N+Ess:  kuksen
    kukse+N+Par:  kuksed
    kukse+N+Pl+Nom:  kuˊvseh
    kukse+N+Pl+Gen: [kuuvsij, kuˊvsij]
    kukse+N+Pl+Acc:  kuuvsijd
    kukse+N+Pl+Ill:  kuvssijd
    kukse+N+Pl+Loc:  kuuvsijn
    kukse+N+Pl+Com:  kuˊvsijguin
    kukse+N+Pl+Abe:  kuˊvsijttáá

  Noun - nijbe: # ok NIJBE
    nijbe+N+Sg+Nom:  nijbe
    nijbe+N+Sg+Gen: [niijbe, niˊjbe]
    nijbe+N+Sg+Acc: [niijbe, niˊjbe]
    nijbe+N+Sg+Ill:  niijbán
    nijbe+N+Sg+Loc:  niijbest
    nijbe+N+Sg+Com:  nijbijn
    nijbe+N+Sg+Abe:  niˊjbettáá
    nijbe+N+Ess:  nijben
    nijbe+N+Par:  nijbed
    nijbe+N+Pl+Nom:  [niijbeh, niˊjbeh]
    nijbe+N+Pl+Gen: [niijbij, niˊjbij]
    nijbe+N+Pl+Acc:  niijbijd
    nijbe+N+Pl+Ill:  [nijbijd, niijbijd]
    nijbe+N+Pl+Loc: niijbijn
    nijbe+N+Pl+Com:  niˊjbijguin
    nijbe+N+Pl+Abe:  niˊjbijttáá

  Noun - ahe: # ok VAHE
    ahe+N+Sg+Nom:  aˊḥe
    ahe+N+Sg+Gen:  aˊṿe
    ahe+N+Sg+Acc:  aˊṿe
    ahe+N+Sg+Ill:  aˊḥan
    ahe+N+Sg+Loc:  avveest
    ahe+N+Sg+Com:  ovvijn
    ahe+N+Sg+Abe:  aˊṿettáá
    ahe+N+Ess:  ahheen
    ahe+N+Par: ahheed
    ahe+N+Pl+Nom:  aˊṿeh
    ahe+N+Pl+Gen: [ooṿij, oˊṿij]
    ahe+N+Pl+Acc:  ooṿijd
    ahe+N+Pl+Ill:  ovvijd
    ahe+N+Pl+Loc:  ooṿijn
    ahe+N+Pl+Com:  oˊṿijguin
    ahe+N+Pl+Abe:  oˊṿijttáá

  Noun - iše: # ok VAHE
    iše+N+Sg+Nom:  iˊṣ̌e
    iše+N+Sg+Gen:  iˊše
    iše+N+Sg+Acc: iˊše
    iše+N+Sg+Ill:  iˊṣ̌án
    iše+N+Sg+Loc:  iššeest
    iše+N+Sg+Com:  iššijn # MM
    iše+N+Sg+Abe:  iˊšettáá
    iše+N+Ess:  iššeen
    iše+N+Par: iššeed
    iše+N+Pl+Nom:  iˊšeh
    iše+N+Pl+Gen: [iišij, iˊšij]
    iše+N+Pl+Acc:  iišijd
    iše+N+Pl+Ill:  [iišijd, iiṣ̌ijd, iššijd] # MM
    iše+N+Pl+Loc:  iišijn
    iše+N+Pl+Com:  iˊšijguin
    iše+N+Pl+Abe:  iˊšijttáá

  Noun - vahe: # ok VAHE
    vahe+N+Sg+Nom: vaˊhe
    vahe+N+Sg+Gen: vaˊṿe
    vahe+N+Sg+Acc: vaˊṿe
    vahe+N+Sg+Ill: vaˊhan
    vahe+N+Sg+Loc: vavveest
    vahe+N+Sg+Com: vovvijn
    vahe+N+Sg+Abe: vaˊṿettáá
    vahe+N+Ess: vahheen
    vahe+N+Par: vahheed
    vahe+N+Pl+Nom: vaˊṿeh
    vahe+N+Pl+Gen: [voovij, voˊṿij]
    vahe+N+Pl+Acc: vooṿijd
    vahe+N+Pl+Ill: vovvijd
    vahe+N+Pl+Loc: vooṿijn
    vahe+N+Pl+Com: voˊṿijguin
    vahe+N+Pl+Abe: voˊṿijttáá
